New York, session 2025-2026, A3323.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 394-cccc to read as follows: 3 § 394-cccc. Internet dating service verification standards. 1. As used 4 in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "identity verification" shall mean the use of an on-demand self- 6 photograph to verify the ownership of a person's government-issued iden- 7 tification; 8 (b) "internet dating service" shall mean a person or entity directly 9 or indirectly in the business, for profit, of offering, promoting, or 10 providing access to dating, relationship, compatibility, or matrimonial 11 or social referral services principally on or through the internet; 12 (c) "license verification" shall mean the use of technology to verify 13 a person's government-issued identification; 14 (d) "location verification" shall mean the use of technology to deter- 15 mine a person's approximate location; 16 (e) "member" means a customer, client or participant who submits to an 17 internet dating service information required to access the service for 18 the purpose of engaging in dating, relationship, compatibility, matrimo- 19 nial, or social referral service; 20 (f) "minor" shall mean a New York resident who is under the age of 21 eighteen; 22 (g) "New York member" shall mean a member who registers for an inter- 23 net dating service and whose primary location is the state of New York; 24 and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06928-01-5 A. 3323 2 1 (h) "primary location" shall mean the state in which the member 2 resides. 3 2. Prior to registering a member for their service, an internet dating 4 service offering services to New York members shall: 5 (a) require all members to use location verification to verify whether 6 a member is located in the state of New York; 7 (b) require all New York members to use license verification for such 8 service. Where it is determined from the license verification that the 9 New York member is a minor, such member shall be prohibited from using 10 the online dating service; and 11 (c) require such New York members to provide identity verification to 12 such service. 13 3. An internet dating service offering services to New York members 14 shall implement a reasonable security feature that prohibits usage of 15 the online dating service that is triggered during any significant peri- 16 od of inactive use. 17 4. An online dating service offering services to New York members 18 shall use reasonable measures to determine a member's primary location. 19 Where such primary location of a member is the state of New York, such 20 online dating service shall require such member to engage in the verifi- 21 cation processes required by this section. Where the member is not 22 determined to reside in New York, such member shall not be required to 23 engage in the verification processes required by this section. 24 5. (a) The attorney general may bring an action against an internet 25 dating service that violates the provisions of this section: 26 (i) To enjoin further violation of the provisions of this section; and 27 (ii) To recover up to five hundred dollars for each New York member 28 registered with the internet dating service but was not subjected to the 29 verification processes required by this section. 30 (b) In an action under subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (a) of this 31 subdivision, a court may increase the damages up to three times the 32 damages allowed by such paragraph where the defendant has been found to 33 have engaged in a pattern and practice of violating the provisions of 34 this section. 35 (c) No internet dating service provider shall be deemed to have 36 violated the provisions of this section if such internet dating service 37 shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the violation was not 38 intentional and resulted from a bona fide error made notwithstanding the 39 maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid such error. 40 (d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict any right 41 which any person may have under any other statute or common law. 42 6. An internet service provider does not violate this section solely 43 as a result of serving as an intermediary for the transmission of elec- 44 tronic messages between members of an internet dating service. 45 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 46 it shall have become a law.